Tennessee, session 114, HB0131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-19-101, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to contracts founded on a wagering
consideration under the Tennessee Sports Gaming Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 49,
part 1.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0131
000944
- 1 -